District of Columbia statutes.
7-501.01

Purpose.

It is the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia that the District government shall insure a full range of health, education, employment, and social services shall be available to the aged in the District of Columbia, and the planning and operation of such programs will be undertaken as a partnership of older citizens, families, community leaders, private agencies, and the District of Columbia government.

History

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title I, § 101, 22 DCR 2456

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2201.
1973 Ed., § 6-1701.

Editor's Notes

Advisory Committee on Aging abolished: The District of Columbia Advisory Committee on Aging was abolished by § 411 of D.C. Law 1-24.